South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1061.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the State Commission on Higher Education, relating to Palmetto Fellows Scholarship Program, designated as Regulation Document Number 5405, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The South Carolina Commission on Higher Education proposes the following revisions to Chapter 62 regulation, R.62-300 through 62-375, Palmetto Fellows Scholarship Program. Revisions to the existing regulation for the Palmetto Fellows Scholarship and Palmetto Fellows Scholarship Enhancement Program are being considered to clarify the policies and procedures for administrating the program. In the proposed amendments, the regulation is being updated to reflect changes to the ACT test, making the Science subject test optional for a Composite score. Lastly, other changes to the regulation include updating of definitions and minor language changes to promote consistency. The proposed regulation will require legislative review. A Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on June 27, 2025. ----XX----